Hawaii statutes.
[§707-717] Terroristic threatening in the
second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of terroristic
threatening in the second degree if the person commits terroristic threatening
other than as provided in section 707-716.

(2) Terroristic threatening in the second
degree is a misdemeanor. [L 1979, c 184, pt of §1(2); gen ch 1993]

Case Notes

Not a lesser included offense of attempted extortion in the
second degree. 70 H. 456, 776 P.2d 392 (1989).

The requirement of a "true threat" jury instruction
is not limited to terroristic threatening prosecutions that are based solely
upon verbal conduct, but rather applies in all such prosecutions, whether the
threat is proved by evidence of verbal expression, motor behavior, or a
combination thereof. 106 H. 136, 102 P.3d 1034 (2005).

Terroristic threatening in second degree can be an offense
included in terroristic threatening in first degree; trial court's failure to
instruct jury on the lesser included offense was not plain error, where
defendant contended there was a rational basis in the record for jury to decide
that, although defendant made a terroristic threat, defendant did not do so
with a dangerous instrument as defined in §707-700. 10 H. App. 584, 880 P.2d
213 (1994).

Defendant's words, yelling at dirt bikers to get off
defendant's land, combined with defendant's conduct of repeatedly discharging
defendant's shotgun, were sufficient evidence to sustain defendant's conviction
under this section. 106 H. 62 (App.), 101 P.3d 671 (2004).

COMMENTARY ON §§707-716 AND 707-717

Act 184, Session Laws 1979, upgraded the offense of
terroristic threatening from a misdemeanor to a class C felony in four
aggravated situations. The legislature felt that raising the penalty would
provide an incentive for vigorous prosecution and act as a deterrent against
such offenses. House Standing Committee Report No. 673. For discussion of a "common
scheme" under §707-716, see Senate Standing Committee Report No. 902.

Act 131, Session Laws 1989, amended §707-716 to establish the
offense of terroristic threatening of an educational worker to make our school
environments safer and to better enable prosecuting attorneys to obtain
convictions. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 998.

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, amended §707-716(1) to limit the
charge of terroristic threatening in the first degree against a public servant
to actions arising out of the performance of the public servant's official
duties. House Standing Committee Report No. 665-06.

Act 79, Session Laws 2007, amended §707-716(1) by
establishing a criminal offense of terroristic threatening in the first degree
if a person commits terroristic threatening against any emergency medical
services personnel [engaged in the performance of duty]. The legislature found
that emergency medical services personnel are at a heightened risk of personal
injury or death from patients and others with whom they are in contact in the
course of their work. By the very nature of the job, emergency medical
services personnel respond to people in distressful situations, which include
incidences of criminal violence, family disputes, and drunken brawls. Although
the legislature acknowledged that much of the violence promulgated from
explosive situations involving agitated people who lack momentary self-control,
the legislature believed that emergency medical [services] personnel should be
afforded the same protection as correctional workers and educational workers. Senate
Standing Committee Report No. 1244.

Act 146, Session Laws 2010, amended §707-716(1) by expanding
the class of emergency services providers protected against terroristic
threatening to include, among others, physicians, physician's assistants,
nurses, and nurse practitioners providing medical services in a hospital
emergency room. The legislature found that emergency medical workers serve an
indispensable public need but face a high level of risk in the line of duty.
Nationally, studies show that between thirty-five per cent and eighty per cent
of hospital staff have been physically assaulted at least once and that nurses
are at an increased risk for violence while on duty. The legislature found
that extending the offense of assault in the second degree to include actions
against emergency services providers in emergency rooms is a logical extension
of the existing provisions covering emergency response personnel. Senate
Standing Committee Report Nos. 2989 and 2765, House Standing Committee Report
No. 466-10, Conference Committee Report No. 33-10.

Act 63, Session Laws 2011, amended §707-716(1) by
establishing first degree terroristic threatening for a person who threatens a
person: (1) from whom the defendant has been restrained, by order of any
court, from contacting, threatening, or physically abusing pursuant to domestic
abuse protective orders; or (2) who is being protected by a police officer
ordering the defendant to leave the premises of the protected person, during
the effective period of the order. The legislature found that domestic violence
victims need added protection under Hawaii law. Restraining orders or orders
from police officers to abusers to leave the premises are intended to remove
abusers from the vicinity of domestic violence victims and provide safety. The
legislature believed that domestic violence victims are particularly vulnerable
when they attempt to disengage from their abusers and at that time, violence
and the threat of violence are at the most extreme levels. Increasing the
penalties against abusers in those situations may deter violent retaliation and
may help break victims from the cycle of violence. House Standing Committee
Report No. 930, Conference Committee Report No. 74, Senate Standing Committee
Report No. 1255.

Act 255, Session Laws 2013, amended §707-716(1) to include
the use of a simulated firearm in the offense of terroristic threatening in the
first degree. The legislature found that simulated firearms are becoming
increasingly difficult to discern from real firearms and as a result, simulated
firearms are being used to commit serious criminal offenses. The victims in
these crimes believe that the weapons are real and are terrorized when
threatened with one. Under existing law, if the weapon is not a real firearm,
the suspect cannot be charged with the higher offense of terroristic
threatening in the first degree and the charge is reduced to a misdemeanor.
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 488, House Standing Committee Report No.
1231.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next